Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.500.040

Distribution of funds.

Local effort assistance funds shall be distributed to qualifying districts as follows:

(1) Thirty percent in April;

(2) Twenty-three percent in May;

(3) Two percent in June;

(4) Seventeen percent in August;

(5) Nine percent in October;

(6) Seventeen percent in November; and

(7) Two percent in December.

[ 1999 c 317 s 4.]